Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB98.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Accredited testing facility" means a facility that tests and certifies welders and welding inspectors,
and which has been accredited by the AWS;
(b) "ASME" means the American Society of Mechanical Engineers;
(c) "AWS" means the American Welding Society;
(d) "Certified welding inspector" means a person who has been certified by the AWS to inspect
structural steel welding projects and is independent of a Kentucky building program having
jurisdiction;
(e) "D1.1" means the current version of the Structural Welding Code-Steel, approved American
National Standard from the AWS;
(f) "D1.5" means the current version of the Bridge Welding Code, approved American National
Standard from the AWS jointly with the American Association of State Highway and Transportation
Officials;
(g) "Structural steel welding" means structural welds, weld repair, the structural system, and the
welding of all primary steel members of a structure per D1.1 and D1.5 established by AWS. Where
ASME work is required, it shall be done by ASME certified welders; and
(h) "Welding standards" means the specifications, guidelines, tests, and other methods used to develop a
system of quality control to ensure that welding is conducted in such a manner that all welds must
meet, at a minimum, D1.1 and D1.5 standards established by the AWS.
(2) To ensure the safety, quality, and integrity of structural steel welding and that all welding standards are
met, the following requirements shall be mandated by general contractors, project managers, contractors,
and subcontractors in all projects involving structural steel welding where the design professional
responsible for the project includes the D1.1 or D1.5 in the job specifications:
(a) Welders performing structural steel welding on a project shall have been tested and certified by:
1. An accredited testing facility; or
2. An individual who has been accredited by the AWS to test and certify welders and welding
inspectors. This individual could be anyone who has been certified by the AWS to inspect
structural steel welding projects; and
(b) Structural steel welding performed on a project shall meet welding standards.
(3) This section shall only apply to projects:
(a) Occurring pursuant to state government contracts; and
(b) When requested by the contracting state government entity.
(4) This section shall not apply to welding projects performed or requested by a homeowner or farmer on the
premises of the homeowner or farmer.
Section 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Signed by Governor April 27, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version